Mississippi, session 2026, HB4178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Tony Lavell Smith of Noxubee County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny in Noxubee County, on September 19, 2006, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was discharged on November 20, 2009.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.